New Jersey, session 222, S2592.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  An insurer shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement policy available for sale in this State, and shall not discriminate in the pricing of such a policy because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant. Applicants shall be accepted at all times throughout the year for any Medicare supplement policy available from an issuer. (2)   The requirements of this subsection shall be applicable to applicants enrolled in Medicare whether enrolled by reason of age or by reason of disability. (3)   This subsection shall not be construed as preventing an issuer from applying a preexisting condition limitation in accordance with the requirements of section 4 of P.L.1982, c. 94 (C.17B:26A-4) except as provided in subsection b. of this section. b.    The issuer of a Medicare supplement policy shall not impose an exclusion of benefits based upon a preexisting condition pursuant to that policy or certificate in the case of an individual described in 42 U.S.C. s.1395ss(s)(3)(B) or (F) who seeks to enroll under the Medicare supplement policy during the period specified in 42 U.S.C. s.1395ss(s)(3)(E) and who submits evidence of the date of termination, disenrollment, or Medicare Part D enrollment along with the application for that Medicare supplement policy. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.